West Virginia, session 2026, SB244.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 13MM. west virginia property tax adjustment act. §11-13MM-8A. Determination of which county to which taxes are to be paid. In the event that a well seat is located in a different county than the property from which the well draws, the ad valorem taxes shall be paid to the county in which the property being drawn from is located and not to the property in which the well seat is located.